Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-14] Relation to Electronic
Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. This chapter modifies,
limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act, P.L. 106-229, title 15 United States Code chapter 96, but does not
modify, limit, or supersede title 15 United States Code section 7001(c), or
authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in title 15
United States Code section 7003(b). [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next